Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.225

Review of data for disproportionate student identification—Technical assistance.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall annually review data from local education agencies, including the percentage of students receiving special education services, to ensure there is not a disproportionate identification of students, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with federal requirements of the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide technical assistance to school districts experiencing issues related to disproportionality and will make available professional development opportunities statewide to support local education agencies, schools, and community partners in promoting inclusionary teaching practices within a multitiered system of supports framework to help safeguard against over-identification and other issues related to disproportionality.

[ 2023 c 417 s 1.]